Massachusetts, session 194th, S478.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 76 of chapter 93 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding, after
paragraph (c)(8), the following new paragraph:-
(9) In addition to the requirements otherwise set forth herein, the provider shall give
every prospective resident a separate document captioned "Disclosure of Entrance Fee Refund"
that clearly states (a) the amount of the entrance fee to be refunded to the resident under the
provider's contract, pursuant to paragraph (4) hereof; and (b) the terms, conditions and
explanation of the process by which the provider shall make such refund to the resident when the
resident leaves the facility or dies. The resident shall sign this statement prior to paying the full
of 2

entrance fee to the provider. This requirement shall not apply to any fee paid to get on a waiting
list for a continuing care retirement community.
of 2